District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.16

Continuity; regulations and rules.

Regulations and rules of any agency, department, administration, board, or commission, the functions of which are transferred by this chapter to the Department, and any Mayor’s order or administrative order not in conflict with this chapter and relating to a function transferred by this chapter, shall continue in force until such time as the Mayor issues new rules, regulations, or orders governing the subject.

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 17, 58 DCR 5403

History